apertium-mag.Lat-Dev.lexd
PATTERNS
Letters+

LEXICON Letters
क:k
ख:kh
ग:g
घ:gh
ङ:ṅ
च:c
छ:ch
ज:j
झ:jh
ञ:ñ
ट:ṭ
ठ:ṭh
ड:ḍ
ड़:ṛ
ढ:ḍh
ढ़:ṛh
ण:ṇ
त:t
थ:th
द:d
ध:dh
न:n
प:p
फ:ph
ब:b
भ:bh
म:m
ह:H
ल:l
श:ś
ष:ṣ
र:r
स:s
व:w
य:y
ं:ṃ
ँ:ṃ # Dir/LR
ं:◌̃
ः:ḥ
ऽ:a
{A}:a
{AA}:ā
{I}:i
{II}:ī
{U}:u
{UU}:ū
{E}:e
{E}:ē
{EE}:e
{EE}:e
{O}:o
{O}:ō
{OO}:o
{OO}:ō
{AI}:ai
{AU}:au
{R}:R

# if it's written as one glyph (NOT codepoint!) on either side,
# list it here
# if the interpretation of a latin letter is context-sensitive,
# list all the contexts

# list any other characters from your lexicon here
